Utah statutes.
58-71-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.

(1)  Any person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions of Section 58-71-501, Subsection 58-1-501(1)(a), or 58-1-501(1)(c) is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  The division may assess administrative penalties in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-71-402, for acts of unlawful conduct.

